Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 9

Private Probation Services Council

16-3-901. Creation.

There is created the private probation services council.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The private probation services council, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

16-3-902. Purpose.

The purpose of the council is to ensure that uniform professional and contract standards are practiced and maintained by private corporations, enterprises and entities engaged in rendering general misdemeanor probation supervision, counseling and collection services to the courts.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 3.

16-3-903. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Council” means the private probation services council;

“Governing authority” means the elected body of any county, municipality or metropolitan government with statutory power to enter into written contracts with corporations, enterprises or entities to provide public services; and

“Private entity” means a privately owned and operated corporation, enterprise or entity that contracts to provide general probation supervision, counseling or collection services for persons convicted of a misdemeanor and placed on probation.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 4.

16-3-904. Attachment to appropriate state entity.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall attach the council to the appropriate state entity for administrative purposes.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 5.

16-3-905. Membership.

The council shall consist of the following seven (7) voting members:

Four (4) members who shall be appointed to serve for four-year terms as follows:

One (1) criminal court judge who shall be appointed by the president of the Tennessee judicial conference, representing a judicial district within which one (1) or more private entities provide probation services; and

Three (3) general sessions court judges who shall be appointed by the president of the Tennessee general sessions judges conference, representing counties within which one (1) or more private entities provide probation services; and

Three (3) members who shall be appointed by the governor to serve four-year terms as follows:

One (1) publicly employed probation officer;

One (1) private probation officer or individual with expertise in private probation service by virtue of training or employment; and

One (1) county commissioner.

Subsequent vacancies on the council shall be filled in the same manner as initially filled.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 6; 2007, ch. 149, § 1.

16-3-906. Officers.

The council shall annually elect from its membership a chair, vice chair and other officers as deemed expedient.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 7.

16-3-907. Staff.

The state entity to which the council is attached for administrative purposes shall provide staff services for the council.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 8.

16-3-908. Meetings.

The council shall meet at such times and places as necessary and convenient.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 9; 2012, ch. 986, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment deleted “at least once each quarter and” following “shall meet”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 49. October 1, 2012.

16-3-909. Duties of council — Fingerprint sample and criminal history records check — Reinstatement of license — Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The purpose of the council is to ensure that uniform professional and contract standards are practiced and maintained by private corporations, enterprises and entities rendering general misdemeanor probation supervision, counseling and collection services to the courts. To such end, the council shall:

Provide oversight of private entities;

Promulgate uniform professional standards and uniform contract standards for private entities;

Establish forty (40) hours of orientation for new private probation officers and eight (8) hours of annual continuing education;

Promulgate rules and regulations regarding noncompliance with the uniform professional standards and uniform contract standards;

Promulgate rules and regulations requiring periodic registration of all private entities; and

Publish an annual summary report.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

The council:

May reinstate a license upon the payment of a renewal fee, as set by the council; and

Shall establish a late renewal fee, to be equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the registration fee.

All rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

All private probation officers to be employed by entities providing private probation services pursuant to this part shall:

Be required to supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a criminal history records check to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI) and the federal bureau of investigation (FBI) or other vendor contracted for the same purposes prior to being employed with such entities; and

Agree that the TBI may send to the council information indicating the results of the criminal history records check. The results will indicate whether the applicant has a criminal conviction that would result in a private probation officer being denied employment by such entities.

The applicant shall pay any reasonable costs incurred by the TBI or FBI, or both, in conducting an investigation of an applicant for employment as a private probation officer. In lieu of additional criminal history records checks for subsequent applications for employment, the applicant may submit copies of the applicant's initial criminal history records check documentation and shall not be required to pay any additional costs.

Acts 1998, ch. 1067, § 10; 2019, ch. 369, §§ 3-5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “eight (8) hours” for “twenty (20) hours” in (a)(3); deleted former (a)(7), which read: “Promulgate rules and regulations requiring criminal records checks of all private probation officers.”; and added (b) and (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 369, § 6. May 10, 2019.

16-3-910. Powers of the council.

The council has the power:

To establish fees sufficient to pay the annual expenses of the council; and

In a lawful proceeding under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, assess civil penalties, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, for violations of statutes, rules or orders enforceable by the council.

Acts 2004, ch. 665, § 1.

16-3-911. Probation contracts with private entities.

No public officer or employee of a governing authority who is involved in making or administering a contract with a private entity that is governed by the council and that provides probation services may derive any direct benefit from the contract.

Acts 2014, ch. 827, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 827, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to all contracts entered into or renewed on or after April 28, 2014.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 827 took effect on April 28, 2014.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 827, § 2. April 28, 2014. [See the Compiler’s Notes.]